Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 22 Adoption

Cross references. —

For provisions prohibiting special laws for adoption of children, see art. 3, § 27, Wyo. Const.

For interstate compact on placement of children, see §§

14-5-101

through

14-5-108

.

As to reports of adoption required to be filed with state registrar of vital records, see §

35-1-416

.

As to issuance of new birth certificate following adoption, see §

35-1-417

.

Editor's notes. —

Sections

1-23-101

to 1-23-124, which were enacted by § 1, ch. 188, Laws 1977, and which related to adoptions, have been deleted, and the provisions which were enacted as §§ 1-726.1 to 1-726.14, W.S. 1957, by § 1, ch. 187, Laws 1977, have been inserted in their place and renumbered as §§

1-22-101

to

1-22-114

, respectively.

Termination of parental rights. —

In an adoption proceeding, the provisions regarding termination of parental rights found in this article control over the more general provisions for the termination of parental rights found in the paternity statutes. GWJ v. MH (In re BGH), 930 P.2d 371,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

See “Adoption Without Parental Consent, to Better the Children's Welfare,” 7 Wyo. L.J. 41.

For a note, “Administrative Problems Relating to Adoption,” see 8 Wyo. L.J. 210.

See comment, “The Wyoming Juvenile Court Act of 1971,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 237 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

2 Am. Jur. 2d Adoption § 1 et seq.

79 Am. Jur. 2d Welfare Laws § 19, 20.

Annulment or vacation of adoption decree by adopting parent or natural parent consenting to adoption, 2 ALR2d 887.

Mental illness and the like of parents as grounds for adoption of their children, 45 ALR2d 1379.

Race as factor in adoption proceedings, 54 ALR2d 909.

Age of prospective adopting parents as factor in adoption proceedings, 56 ALR2d 823.

Conflict of laws as to contract to adopt, 81 ALR2d 1128.

Who, other than natural or adopting parents, or heirs of the latter, may collaterally attack adoption decree, 92 ALR2d 813.

Requirements as to residence or domicile of adoptee or adoptive parent for purposes of adoption, 33 ALR3d 176.

Religion as a factor in adoption proceedings, 48 ALR3d 383.

Validity and enforcement of agreement by foster parents that they will not attempt to adopt foster child, 78 ALR3d 770.

Restricting access to judicial records of concluded adoption proceedings, 83 ALR3d 800.

Restricting access to judicial records of pending adoption proceedings, 83 ALR3d 824.

Grandparents' visitation rights, 90 ALR3d 222.

Modern status of law as to equitable adoption or adoption by estoppel, 97 ALR3d 347.

Admissibility of social worker's expert testimony on child custody issues, 1 ALR4th 837.

Validity of agreement to pay expenses attendant on birth of child on condition that natural parents consent to adoption of child, 43 ALR4th 935.

Required parties in adoption proceedings, 48 ALR4th 860.

Action for wrongful adoption based on misrepresentation of child's mental or physical condition or parentage, 56 ALR4th 375.

Validity and construction of surrogate parenting agreement, 77 ALR4th 70.

Liability of public or private agency or its employees to prospective adoptive parents in contract or tort for failure to complete arrangement for adoption, 8 ALR5th 860.

Attorney malpractice in connection with services related to adoption of child, 18 ALR5th 892.

Adoption of child by same-sex partners, 27 ALR5th 54.

2 C.J.S. Adoption of Persons § 1 et seq.